North Carolina, session 2025, HB784.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1. Chapter 14 of the General Statutes is amended by adding a new Article
to read:
"Article 53D.
"Semiautomatic Assault Weapon and Large Capacity Ammunition Feeding Device Prohibition.
"§ 14-409.48. Definitions.
The following definitions apply in this Article:
(1) Large capacity ammunition feeding device. – A magazine, belt, drum, feed
strip, or similar device manufactured after the effective date of this Article that
has a capacity of, or that can be readily restored or converted to accept, more
than 10 rounds of ammunition. This term does not include an attached tubular
device designed to accept, and capable of operating only with, .22 caliber
rimfire ammunition.
(2) Semiautomatic assault weapon. – Means any of the following:
a. Any of the firearms, or copies or duplicates of the firearms in any
caliber, known as any of the following:
1. Norinco, Mitchell, and Poly Technologies Avtomat
Kalashnikovs, all models.
2. Action Arms Israeli Military Industries Uzi and Galil.
3. Beretta Ar70 (SC-70).
4. Colt AR-15.
5. Fabrique National FN/FAL, FN/LAR, and FNC.
6. SWD M-10, M-11, M-11/9, and M-12.
7. Steyr AUG.
8. INTRATEC TEC-9, TEC-DC9, and TEC-22.
9. Revolving cylinder shotguns, such as or similar to Street
Sweeper and Striker 12.
b. A semiautomatic rifle that has an ability to accept a detachable
magazine and has at least two of the following features:
1. A folding or telescoping stock.
2. A pistol grip that protrudes conspicuously beneath the action
of the weapon.
*H784-v-1*

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
3. A bayonet mount.
4. A flash suppressor or threaded barrel designed to
accommodate a flash suppressor.
5. A grenade launcher.
c. A semiautomatic pistol that has an ability to accept a detachable
magazine and has at least two of the following features:
1. An ammunition magazine that attaches to the pistol outside of
the pistol grip.
2. A threaded barrel capable of accepting a barrel extender, flash
suppressor, forward handgrip, or silencer.
3. A shroud that is attached to, or partially or completely
encircles, the barrel and that permits the shooter to hold the
firearm with the nontrigger hand without being burned.
4. A manufactured weight of 50 ounces or more when the pistol
is unloaded.
5. A semiautomatic version of an automatic firearm.
d. A semiautomatic shotgun that has at least two of the following
features:
1. A folding or telescopic stock.
2. A pistol grip that protrudes conspicuously beneath the action
of the weapon.
3. A fixed magazine capacity in excess of five rounds.
4. An ability to accept a detachable magazine.
"§ 14-409.49. Semiautomatic assault weapons and large capacity ammunition feeding
devices prohibited; identification markings.
(a) Prohibition. – Except as otherwise provided in this section, it is unlawful for a person
in this State to (i) manufacture, transfer, or possess a semiautomatic assault weapon or (ii) transfer
or possess a large capacity ammunition feeding device.
(b) Exceptions. – The prohibition in subsection (a) of this section does not apply to any
of the following:
(1) The possession or transfer of any semiautomatic assault weapon or large
capacity ammunition feeding device otherwise lawfully possessed on the
effective date of this Article.
(2) The manufacture of any semiautomatic assault weapon or large capacity
ammunition feeding device on or before the effective date of this Article.
(3) Any firearm that meets any of the following requirements:
a. Is manually operated by bolt, pump, lever, or slide action.
b. Has been rendered permanently inoperable.
c. Is an antique firearm.
(4) Any semiautomatic rifle that cannot accept a detachable magazine that holds
more than five rounds of ammunition.
(5) Any semiautomatic shotgun that cannot hold more than five rounds of
ammunition in a fixed or detachable magazine.
(6) The manufacture for, transfer to, or possession by the United States, a
department or agency of the United States or this State, a political subdivision
of this State, or a transfer to or possession by a law enforcement officer
employed by such an entity for purposes of law enforcement.
(7) The transfer to a licensee under Title I of the Atomic Energy Act of 1954 for
purposes of establishing and maintaining an on-site physical protection
system and security organization required by federal law, or possession by an
employee or contractor of such licensee on-site for such purposes or off-site
Page 2 House Bill 784-First Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
for purposes of licensee-authorized training or transportation of nuclear
materials.
(8) The possession by an individual who is retired from service with a law
enforcement agency and is not otherwise prohibited from receiving a firearm
or ammunition of a semiautomatic assault weapon or large capacity
ammunition feeding device transferred to the individual by the agency upon
such retirement.
(9) The manufacture, transfer, or possession of a semiautomatic assault weapon
or large capacity ammunition feeding device by a licensed manufacturer or
licensed importer for the purposes of testing or experimentation authorized by
federal law.
(c) Identification Markings. – The serial number of any semiautomatic assault weapon
manufactured in this State after the effective date of this Article shall clearly show the date on
which the weapon was manufactured. A large capacity ammunition feeding device manufactured
in this State after the effective date of this Article shall be identified by a serial number that
clearly shows that the device was manufactured or imported after the effective date of this Article.
(d) Punishment. – A violation of this section is punishable as a Class E felony."
SECTION 2. This act becomes effective December 1, 2025, and applies to offenses
committed on or after that date.
House Bill 784-First Edition Page 3